test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VINIT - aagam :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     aagam+NA: aagam
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+aagam+NA: ndaagam
     2+aagam+NA: gdaagam
     X+aagam+NA: daagam
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aagam+NA+Con: aagmenh
     aagam+NA+Dim: aagmens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aagam+NA+Pej: aagmish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     aagam+NA+Prt: aagmiba
     aagam+NA+Voc+Pl: aagmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     aagam+NA+4: aagman
     aagam+NA+Loc: aagming
     aagam+NA+Pl: aagmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+aagam+NA+Con: ndaagmenh
     1+aagam+NA+Dim: ndaagmens
     2+aagam+NA+Con: gdaagmenh
     2+aagam+NA+Dim: gdaagmens
     X+aagam+NA+Con: daagmenh
     X+aagam+NA+Dim: daagmens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos: ndaagmim
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos: gdaagmim
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos: daagmim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+aagam+NA+Pej: ndaagmish
     2+aagam+NA+Pej: gdaagmish
     X+aagam+NA+Pej: daagmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl: ndaagminaa
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl: gdaagminaa
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl: gdaagmiwaa
     3+aagam+NA+3+4: daagmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Prt: ndaagmiba
     1+aagam+NA+Voc+Pl: ndaagmidig
     2+aagam+NA+Prt: gdaagmiba
     2+aagam+NA+Voc+Pl: gdaagmidig
     X+aagam+NA+Prt: daagmiba
     X+aagam+NA+Voc+Pl: daagmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+aagam+NA+4: ndaagman
     1+aagam+NA+Loc: ndaagming
     1+aagam+NA+Pl: ndaagmag
     2+aagam+NA+4: gdaagman
     2+aagam+NA+Loc: gdaagming
     2+aagam+NA+Pl: gdaagmag
     3+aagam+NA+4: daagman
     3+aagam+NA+Loc: daagming
     X+aagam+NA+4: daagman
     X+aagam+NA+Loc: daagming
     X+aagam+NA+Pl: daagmag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej: aagmenyish
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej: aagmensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     aagam+NA+Con+Prt: aagmenyba
     aagam+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: aagmenydig
     aagam+NA+Dim+Prt: aagmensba
     aagam+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: aagmensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     aagam+NA+Con+4: aagmenyin
     aagam+NA+Con+Loc: aagmenying
     aagam+NA+Con+Pl: aagmenyig
     aagam+NA+Dim+4: aagmensan
     aagam+NA+Dim+Loc: aagmensing
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pl: aagmensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     aagam+NA+Pej+Prt: aagmishba
     aagam+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: aagmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     aagam+NA+Pej+4: aagmishan
     aagam+NA+Pej+Loc: aagmishing
     aagam+NA+Pej+Pl: aagmishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     aagam+NA+Prt+4: aagmibniin
     aagam+NA+Prt+Loc: aagmibniing
     aagam+NA+Prt+Pl: aagmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos: ndaagmenyim
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos: ndaagmensim
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos: gdaagmenyim
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gdaagmensim
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos: daagmenyim
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos: daagmensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej: ndaagmenyish
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej: ndaagmensish
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej: gdaagmenyish
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej: gdaagmensish
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pej: daagmenyish
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej: daagmensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl: ndaagmenynaa
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl: ndaagmensnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+1+Pl: gdaagmenynaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+2+Pl: gdaagmenywaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gdaagmensnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gdaagmenswaa
     3+aagam+NA+Con+3+4: daagmenyni
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+3+4: daagmensni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Prt: ndaagmenyba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenydig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt: ndaagmensba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensdig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Prt: gdaagmenyba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenydig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt: gdaagmensba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensdig
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Prt: daagmenyba
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: daagmenydig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Prt: daagmensba
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: daagmensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+4: ndaagmenyin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Loc: ndaagmenying
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pl: ndaagmenyig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+4: ndaagmensan
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Loc: ndaagmensing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pl: ndaagmensag
     2+aagam+NA+Con+4: gdaagmenyin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Loc: gdaagmenying
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pl: gdaagmenyig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+4: gdaagmensan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Loc: gdaagmensing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pl: gdaagmensag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+4: daagmenyin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Loc: daagmenying
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+4: daagmensan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Loc: daagmensing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+4: daagmenyin
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Loc: daagmenying
     X+aagam+NA+Con+Pl: daagmenyig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+4: daagmensan
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Loc: daagmensing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+Pl: daagmensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej: ndaagmimish
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gdaagmimish
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej: daagmimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndaagmimnaa
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdaagmimnaa
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdaagmimwaa
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+3+4: daagmimni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt: ndaagmimba
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndaagmimdig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gdaagmimba
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdaagmimdig
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Prt: daagmimba
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: daagmimdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+4: ndaagmiman
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Loc: ndaagmiming
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pl: ndaagmimag
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+4: gdaagmiman
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gdaagmiming
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gdaagmimag
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+4: daagmiman
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Loc: daagmiming
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+4: daagmiman
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Loc: daagmiming
     X+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pl: daagmimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl: ndaagmishnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gdaagmishnaa
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gdaagmishwaa
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4: daagmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt: ndaagmishba
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndaagmishdig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt: gdaagmishba
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdaagmishdig
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Prt: daagmishba
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: daagmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+4: ndaagmishan
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Loc: ndaagmishing
     1+aagam+NA+Pej+Pl: ndaagmishag
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+4: gdaagmishan
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Loc: gdaagmishing
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+Pl: gdaagmishag
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+4: daagmishan
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+Loc: daagmishing
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+4: daagmishan
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Loc: daagmishing
     X+aagam+NA+Pej+Pl: daagmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagminaanba
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagminaandig
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagminaanba
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagminaandig
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmiwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmiwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+3+4+Prt: daagminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+4: ndaagminaanin
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagminaaning
     1+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagminaanig
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+4: gdaagminaanin
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagminaaning
     2+aagam+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagminaanig
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+4: gdaagmiwaan
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmiwaang
     2+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmiwaag
     3+aagam+NA+2+Pl+4: daagmiwaan
     3+aagam+NA+2+Pl+Loc: daagmiwaang
     3+aagam+NA+3+4+4: daagminwan
     3+aagam+NA+3+4+Loc: daagminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Prt+4: ndaagmibniin
     1+aagam+NA+Prt+Loc: ndaagmibniing
     1+aagam+NA+Prt+Pl: ndaagmibniig
     2+aagam+NA+Prt+4: gdaagmibniin
     2+aagam+NA+Prt+Loc: gdaagmibniing
     2+aagam+NA+Prt+Pl: gdaagmibniig
     3+aagam+NA+Prt+4: daagmibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Prt+Loc: daagmibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Prt+4: daagmibniin
     X+aagam+NA+Prt+Loc: daagmibniing
     X+aagam+NA+Prt+Pl: daagmibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: aagmenyshiba
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: aagmenyshidig
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: aagmensshiba
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: aagmensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+4: aagmenyshan
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: aagmenyshing
     aagam+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: aagmenyshag
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+4: aagmensshan
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: aagmensshing
     aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: aagmensshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     aagam+NA+Con+Prt+4: aagmenybaniin
     aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: aagmenybaniing
     aagam+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: aagmenybaniig
     aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+4: aagmensbaniin
     aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: aagmensbaniing
     aagam+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: aagmensbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+4: aagmishbaniin
     aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: aagmishbaniing
     aagam+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: aagmishbaniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: ndaagmenymish
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: ndaagmensmish
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gdaagmenymish
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gdaagmensmish
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: daagmenymish
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: daagmensmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndaagmenyminaa
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: ndaagmensminaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdaagmenyminaa
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdaagmenymiwaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gdaagmensminaa
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gdaagmensmiwaa
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: daagmenymini
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: daagmensmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: ndaagmenymiba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenymidig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: ndaagmensmiba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensmidig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gdaagmenymiba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenymidig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gdaagmensmiba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensmidig
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: daagmenymiba
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: daagmenymidig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: daagmensmiba
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: daagmensmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: ndaagmenyman
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: ndaagmenyming
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: ndaagmenymag
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: ndaagmensman
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: ndaagmensming
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: ndaagmensmag
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gdaagmenyman
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gdaagmenyming
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gdaagmenymag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gdaagmensman
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gdaagmensming
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gdaagmensmag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: daagmenyman
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: daagmenyming
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: daagmensman
